tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Bileşenleri > Kulaklıklar ve Kafa Üstü Kulaklıklar > Kulaklıklar: Kemik İletimli Kulaklıklar; DJ Kulaklıkları; Kulak İçi Kulaklıklar; Kulak Üstü Kulaklıklar; Kulak Üzeri Kulaklıklar
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lydkomponenter > Hovedtelefoner og headset > Hovedtelefoner: Knogleledningshovedtelefoner; DJ-hovedtelefoner; In-Ear hovedtelefoner; On-Ear hovedtelefoner; Over-Ear hovedtelefoner
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydkomponenter > Hodetelefoner og headset > Hodetelefoner: Beninduksjons-hodetelefoner; DJ-hodetelefoner; In-Ear-hodetelefoner; On-Ear-hodetelefoner; Over-Ear-hodetelefoner
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudkomponenter > Hörlurar och headsets > Hörlurar: Hörlurar för benledning; DJ-hörlurar; In-ear-hörlurar; On-ear-hörlurar; Over-ear-hörlurar
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Συστατικά ήχου > Ακουστικά (Headphones & Headsets) > Ακουστικά (Headphones): Ακουστικά αγωγής οστών; Ακουστικά DJ; Ακουστικά εντός αυτιού (In-Ear); Ακουστικά επάνω στο αυτί (On-Ear); Ακουστικά πάνω από το αυτί (Over-Ear)
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 구성품 > 헤드폰/헤드셋 > 헤드폰: 골전도 헤드폰; DJ 헤드폰; 인이어 헤드폰; 온이어 헤드폰; 오버이어 헤드폰
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Bộ phận thiết bị âm thanh > Tai nghe và tai nghe có micro > Tai nghe: Tai nghe dẫn truyền qua xương; Tai nghe DJ; Tai nghe nhét tai; Tai nghe ngoài tai; Tai nghe chụp tai
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Components > Headphones & Headsets > Headphones: Bone Conduction Headphones; DJ Headphones; In-Ear Headphones; On-Ear Headphones; Over-Ear Headphones
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > ส่วนประกอบทางเสียง > หูฟังและชุดหูฟัง > หูฟังแบบครอบหู: หูฟังผ่านการสั่นสะเทือนของกระดูก; หูฟังดีเจ; หูฟังอินเอียร์; หูฟังแบบแนบหู; หูฟังแบบครอบหู
it: Elettronica > Audio > Componenti audio > Cuffie e auricolari > Cuffie: Cuffie cocleari; Cuffie da DJ; Cuffie intrauricolari; Cuffie on-ear; Cuffie over-ear
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso komponentai > Ausinės ir ausinės su mikrofonais > Ausinės: Kaulų laidumo ausinės; DJ ausinės; Į ausis įkišamos ausinės; Uždedamos ausinės; Ausis gaubiančios ausinės
es: Electrónica > Audio > Equipo de sonido > Auriculares y auriculares con micrófono > Auriculares: Auriculares de conducción ósea; Auriculares para DJ; Auriculares internos; Auriculares supraurales; Auriculares de diadema
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Componentes áudio > Auscultadores e auriculares > Auscultadores: Auscultadores de condução óssea; Auscultadores DJ; Auscultadores intra-auriculares; Auscultadores de ouvido; Auscultadores sobre o ouvido
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Componentes para equipamentos de áudio > Fones de ouvido e headsets > Fones de ouvido: Fones de ouvido por condução óssea; Fones de ouvido para DJs; Fones de ouvido intra-auriculares; Fones de ouvido supra-auriculares; Fones de ouvido circumaural
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Composants audio > Casques et micro-casques > Casques audio: Casques à conduction osseuse; Casques DJ; Écouteurs intra-auriculaires; Casques supra-auriculaires; Casques circum-auriculaires
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvukové komponenty > Sluchátka a náhlavní soupravy > Sluchátka: Sluchátka na lícní kosti; Sluchátka pro DJ; Intraaurální sluchátka (do uší); Supraaurální sluchátka (na uši); Cirkumaurální sluchátka (přes uši)
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkomponensek > Fejhallgatók és fülhallgatók > Fejhallgatók: Csontvezetéses fejhallgatók; DJ-fejhallgatók; Fülbe helyezhető fejhallgatók; Fülre helyezhető fejhallgatók; Fül feletti fejhallgatók
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Componente audio > Căști audio și căști audio cu microfon > Căști audio: Căști audio cu conducție osoasă; Căști audio pentru DJ; Căști audio intraaurale; Căști audio supraaurale; Căști audio circumaurale
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Audio komponenty > Slúchadlá a náhlavné súpravy > Slúchadlá: Bezdrôtové slúchadlá; DJ slúchadlá; Slúchadlá do uší; Slúchadlá na uši; Slúchadlá cez uši
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオ機器 > イヤホン・ヘッドセット > ヘッドフォン: 骨伝導ヘッドフォン; DJヘッドフォン; インイヤーヘッドフォン; オンイヤーヘッドフォン; オーバーイヤーヘッドフォン
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Компоненты аудиосистем > Наушники и гарнитуры > Наушники: Наушники с костной проводимостью; Диджейские наушники; Внутриканальные наушники; Вставные наушники; Накладные наушники
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio dijelovi > Slušalice i slušalice s mikrofonom > Slušalice: Slušalice s prijenosom preko kostiju; Slušalice za DJ-a; Slušalice koje se umeću u uši; Slušalice koje se stavljaju na uši; Naglavne slušalice
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiokomponentit > Kuulokkeet ja kuulokemikrofonit > Kuulokkeet: Luujohdinkuulokkeet; DJ-kuulokkeet; Korvansisäiset kuulokkeet; Korvanpäälliset kuulokkeet; Korvanyliset kuulokkeet
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Elementy audio > Słuchawki i zestawy słuchawkowe > Słuchawki: Słuchawki z przewodnictwem kostnym; Słuchawki DJ-skie; Słuchawki douszne; Słuchawki nauszne; Słuchawki wokółuszne
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音訊元件 > 耳機與頭戴式耳機 > 耳機: 骨傳導耳機; DJ 耳機; 入耳式耳機; 貼耳式耳機; 耳罩式耳機
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиокомпоненти > Слушалки с микрофони > Слушалки: Слушалки за костна проводимост; DJ слушалки; Слушалки за поставяне в ушите; Слушалки за поставяне на ушите; Слушалки за поставяне върху ушите
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio komponente > Slušalke in slušalke z mikrofonom > Slušalke: Slušalke s kostno prevodnostjo; DJ slušalke; Ušesne slušalke; Slušalke za namestitev na uho; Slušalke za namestitev čez uho
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiokomponenten > Kopfhörer & Headsets > Kopfhörer: Knochenleitkopfhörer; DJ-Kopfhörer; In-Ear-Kopfhörer; On-Ear-Kopfhörer; Over-Ear-Kopfhörer
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audiocomponenten > Hoofdtelefoons en headsets > Koptelefoon: Koptelefoons met beengeleiding; DJ-koptelefoons; In-ear koptelefoons; On-ear koptelefoons; Over-ear koptelefoons
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频组件 > 耳机/耳麦 > 耳机: 骨传导耳机; DJ 耳机; 入耳式耳机; 贴耳式耳机; 包耳式耳机